Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.320.080

Commencement exercises—Lip reading instruction—Joint purchasing, including issuing interest bearing warrants and agreements with private schools—Budgets.

Every board of directors, unless otherwise specifically provided by law, shall:

(1) Provide for the expenditure of a reasonable amount for suitable commencement exercises;

(2) In addition to providing free instruction in lip reading for children disabled by defective hearing, make arrangements for free instruction in lip reading to adults disabled by defective hearing whenever in its judgment such instruction appears to be in the best interests of the school district and adults concerned;

(3) Join with boards of directors of other school districts or an educational service district pursuant to RCW 28A.310.180(3), or both such school districts and educational service district in buying supplies, equipment and services by establishing and maintaining a joint purchasing agency, or otherwise, when deemed for the best interests of the district, any joint agency formed hereunder being herewith authorized and empowered to issue interest bearing warrants in payment of any obligation owed: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That those agencies issuing interest bearing warrants shall assign accounts receivable in an amount equal to the amount of the outstanding interest bearing warrants to the county treasurer issuing such interest bearing warrants: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the joint purchasing agency shall consider the request of any one or more private schools requesting the agency to jointly buy supplies, equipment, and services including but not limited to school bus maintenance services, and, after considering such request, may cooperate with and jointly make purchases with private schools of supplies, equipment, and services, including but not limited to school bus maintenance services, so long as such private schools pay in advance their proportionate share of the costs or provide a surety bond to cover their proportionate share of the costs involved in such purchases;

(4) Consider the request of any one or more private schools requesting the board to jointly buy supplies, equipment and services including but not limited to school bus maintenance services, and, after considering such request, may provide such joint purchasing services: PROVIDED, That such private schools pay in advance their proportionate share of the costs or provide a surety bond to cover their proportionate share of the costs involved in such purchases; and

(5) Prepare budgets as provided for in chapter 28A.505 RCW.

[ 1995 c 77 s 21; 1990 c 33 s 331; 1986 c 77 s 1; 1983 c 125 s 1; 1981 c 308 s 1; 1979 ex.s. c 66 s 2; 1971 c 26 s 1; 1969 c 53 s 2; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.107. Prior: 1969 c 53 s 1, part; 1967 ex.s. c 29 s 1, part; 1967 c 12 s 1, part; 1965 ex.s. c 49 s 1, part; 1963 c 104 s 1, part; 1963 c 5 s 1, part; 1961 c 305 s 1, part; 1961 c 237 s 1, part; 1961 c 66 s 1, part; 1955 c 68 s 2, part; prior: 1943 c 52 s 1, part; 1941 c 179 s 1, part; 1939 c 131 s 1, part; 1925 ex.s. c 57 s 1, part; 1919 c 89 s 3, part; 1915 c 44 s 1, part; 1909 c 97 p 285 s 2, part; 1907 c 240 s 5, part; 1903 c 104 s 17, part; 1901 c 41 s 3, part; 1897 c 118 s 40, part; 1890 p 364 s 26, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 4776, part. Formerly RCW 28A.58.107, 28.58.100(7), (13) and (14).]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 308: "If any provision of this amendatory act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1981 c 308 s 3.]

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 66: See note following RCW 28A.310.180.